Missouri, session 2026, SB1166.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 304 and 590, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 304.286
and 590.1000, to read as follows:
304.286. No county, city, town, village, municipality,
state agency, or other political subdivision of this state
that is authorized to issue a notice for a violation of a
state or local traffic law or regulation shall use or employ
an automated photo red light enforcement system at any
intersection within its jurisdiction. As used in this
section, the term "automated photo red light enforcement
system" means a device, consisting of a camera or cameras
and a vehicle sensor or sensors, that is installed to work
in conjunction with a traffic control signal and used to
produce recorded images of motor vehicles entering an
intersection against a red signal indication.
590.1000. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Automated license plate reader system", a system
of one or more cameras combined with computer algorithms to

SB 1166 2
convert images of license plates into data readable by a
computer;
(2) "Captured plate data", the global positioning
device coordinates, date and time, photograph, license plate
number, and any other data captured by an automated license
plate reader system;
(3) "License plate", the same meaning as is ascribed
to such term or the term "registration plate" in chapter 301;
(4) "Public highway", any public thoroughfare for
vehicles, including state highways, county roads, and public
streets, avenues, boulevards, parkways, and alleys in any
municipality.
2. No county, city, town, village, municipality, state
agency, or other political subdivision of this state shall
purchase, install, or use any automated license plate reader
system, or access or use plate data captured from vehicles
located on a public highway.
3. This section shall not apply with regard to
automated license plate reader systems affixed to vehicles
occupied by a peace officer.
4. This section shall not apply with regard to the
accessing or use of captured plate data captured by a third-
party vendor in accordance with sections 303.420 to 303.440.
✓